Rhode Island, session 2025, SB860.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-7.1-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-7.1 entitled "The Paul
W. Crowley Rhode Island Student Investment Initiative [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode
Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-7.1-5. Intervention and support for failing schools.
(a) The board of regents shall adopt a series of progressive support and intervention
strategies consistent with the Comprehensive Education Strategy and the principles of the “School
Accountability for Learning and Teaching” (SALT) of the board of regents for those schools and
school districts that continue to fall short of performance goals outlined in the district strategic
plans. These strategies shall initially focus on: (1) technical assistance in improvement planning,
curriculum alignment, student assessment, instruction, and family and community involvement; (2)
policy support; (3) resource oversight to assess and recommend that each school has adequate
resources necessary to meet performance goal; and (4) creating supportive partnerships with
education institutions, business, governmental, or other appropriate nonprofit agencies. If after a
three (3) year period of support there has not been improvement in the education of students as
determined by objective criteria to be developed by the board of regents, then there shall be
progressive levels of control by the department of elementary and secondary education over the
school and/or district budget, program, and/or personnel. This control by the department of
elementary and secondary education may be exercised in collaboration with the school district and

the municipality. If further needed, the school shall be reconstituted. Reconstitution responsibility
is delegated to the board of regents and may range from restructuring the school’s governance,
budget, program, personnel, and/or may include decisions regarding the continued operation of the
school. The board of regents (or successor body) may, if further needed, authorize the
commissioner to appoint a receiver to manage a school district with the authority described in § 16-
7.1-5.2. The board of regents shall assess the district’s capacity and may recommend the provision
of additional district, municipal and/or state resources. If a school or school district is under the
board of regents’ control as a result of actions taken by the board pursuant to this section, the local
school committee shall be responsible for funding that school or school district at the same level as
in the prior academic year increased by the same percentage as the state total of school aid is
increased.
(b) For FY 2007, the department shall dedicate one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
from funds appropriated to support progressive support and intervention and SALT visits to support
the Rhode Island Consortium for Instructional Leadership and Training. This consortium is
engaged in training school leaders to be more effective instructional leaders in the standards based
instruction environment.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001466
========
LC001466 - Page 2 of 3